Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3401
Act, how cited; termination.

Sections 2-3401 to 2-3416 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Poultry and Egg Resources Act. The Nebraska Poultry and Egg Resources Act terminates on December 31, 2027.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 7.
March 17, 2026December 31, 2027